Maryland, session 2026, SB0889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSUMER DATA” INCLUDES PERSONAL DATA AND SENSITIVE
DATA, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) “DEVICE DATA” MEANS INFORMATION ABOUT A DEVICE OWNED
OR USED BY A CONSUMER, INCLUDING AVAILABLE BATTERY LIFE.
(4) “PROCESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(5) “PROFILING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(6) “SURVEILLANCE–BASED PRICE SETTING” MEANS THE PRACTICE
OF SETTING THE PRICE OF CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES BASED ON PROFILING
OR OTHER PROCESSING OF CONSUMER OR DEVICE DATA.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A MERCHANT THAT CONDUCTS BUSINESS IN
THE STATE OR PROVIDES CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES TO CONSUMERS IN THE
STATE.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MERCHANT THAT OFFERS A
CUSTOMIZED PRICE TO A CONSUMER OR GROUP OF CONSUMERS WHEN THE
DIFFERENT PRICES:

SENATE BILL 889 3
(1) ARE BASED ON DIFFERENCES IN COST TO PROVIDE A GOOD OR
SERVICE TO DIFFERENT CONSUMERS; OR
(2) REFLECT A DISCOUNT OFFERED TO ALL CONSUMERS OF A GROUP
ON EQUAL TERMS CONSISTENT WITH ANTIDISCRIMINATION LAWS.
(D) A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN SURVEILLANCE–BASED PRICE SETTING
OR UTILIZE A THIRD PARTY TO ENGAGE IN SURVEILLANCE–BASED PRICE SETTING.
13–322.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSUMER GOODS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–301 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) “ELECTRONIC SHELVING LABEL” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
AND WIRELESS PAPER DISPLAY THAT SHOWS PRODUCT AND PRICING INFORMATION
OF CONSUMER GOODS.
(II) “ELECTRONIC SHELVING LABEL” INCLUDES E–PAPER.
(4) “FOOD RETAILER” MEANS A MERCHANT THAT OPERATES A
BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
(I) HAS A MINIMUM OF 15,000 SQUARE FEET; AND
(II) SELLS FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE
TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “NONDIGITAL PRESENTATION OF PRICE” MEANS:
(I) A SIGN THAT OFFERS THE UNIT PRICE FOR ONE OR MORE
BRANDS OR SIZES OF A CONSUMER GOOD;
(II) A STICKER, STAMP, SIGN, LABEL, OR TAG INDICATING THE
PRICE OF A CONSUMER GOOD AFFIXED TO THE SHELF ON WHICH THE CONSUMER
GOOD IS DISPLAYED; OR
(III) A STICKER, STAMP, LABEL, OR TAG INDICATING THE PRICE
OF A CONSUMER GOOD AFFIXED TO THE CONSUMER GOOD.

SENATE BILL 889
(B) A FOOD RETAILER MAY NOT USE ELECTRONIC SHELVING LABELS OR
ANY DIGITAL SHELF DISPLAY TECHNOLOGY TO DISPLAY THE PRICE OF CONSUMER
GOODS.
(C) A FOOD RETAILER SHALL USE NONDIGITAL PRESENTATIONS OF PRICE
TO DISPLAY THE PRICE OF CONSUMER GOODS.
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(w) (1) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer.
(2) “Personal data” does not include:
(i) De–identified data; or
(ii) Publicly available information.
(y) (1) “Process” means an operation or set of operations performed by manual
or automated means on personal data.
(2) “Process” includes collecting, using, storing, disclosing, analyzing,
deleting, or modifying personal data.
(aa) “Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on personal
data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable
consumer’s economic situation, health, demographic characteristics, personal preferences,
interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.
(gg) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
(1) Data revealing:
(i) Racial or ethnic origin;
(ii) Religious beliefs;
(iii) Consumer health data;
(iv) Sex life;
(v) Sexual orientation;
(vi) Status as transgender or nonbinary;

SENATE BILL 889 5
(vii) National origin; or
(viii) Citizenship or immigration status;
(2) Genetic data or biometric data;
(3) Personal data of a consumer that the controller knows or has reason to
know is a child; or
(4) Precise geolocation data.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner may conduct
an investigation to determine whether a provision of this title has been violated on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or may require a written complaint.
(e) (7) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE WHETHER § 3–718 OF
THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT OF AN
EMPLOYEE.
3–718.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM,
SOFTWARE, OR PROCESS THAT USES COMPUTATION TO ASSIST, APPROXIMATE, OR
REPLACE HUMAN DECISION MAKING.
(II) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” INCLUDES A SYSTEM,
SOFTWARE, OR A PROCESS DERIVED FROM MACHINE LEARNING, STATISTICS, OR
OTHER DATA PROCESSING OR TECHNIQUES THAT UTILIZE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “SURVEILLANCE–BASED WAGE SETTING” MEANS THE USE OF
SURVEILLANCE DATA IN CONJUNCTION WITH AN AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM TO
OFFER OR INFORM A CUSTOMIZED WAGE FOR A SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OR GROUP OF
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 889
(4) “SURVEILLANCE DATA” MEANS DATA OBTAINED THROUGH
OBSERVATION, INFERENCE, OR SURVEILLANCE OF AN INDIVIDUAL RELATING TO
PERSONAL OR GENETIC INFORMATION, BEHAVIOR, OR BIOMETRICS OF THE
INDIVIDUAL OR A GROUP, BAND, CLASS, OR TIER TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL
BELONGS.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF AN EMPLOYER:
(1) OFFERS A CUSTOMIZED WAGE BASED ON DATA SPECIFIC TO AN
EMPLOYEE THAT IS:
(I) DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE TASK THE EMPLOYEE WAS
HIRED TO PERFORM; OR
(II) BASED ON THE LOCATION WHERE THE EMPLOYEE WORKS
AND THE COST OF LIVING IN THAT LOCATION; AND
(2) BEFORE HIRING AN EMPLOYEE WHOSE WAGES ARE SET IN WHOLE
OR IN PART THROUGH AN AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM, DISCLOSES IN PLAIN
LANGUAGE TO THE EMPLOYEE WHAT DATA IS CONSIDERED AND HOW THE
AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM CONSIDERS THE DATA.
(C) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT ENGAGE IN SURVEILLANCE–BASED WAGE
SETTING.
(D) (1) WHENEVER THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN VIOLATED, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) TRY TO RESOLVE ANY ISSUE INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION
INFORMALLY BY MEDIATION; OR
(II) ASK THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO BRING AN ACTION ON
BEHALF OF THE APPLICANT OR EMPLOYEE.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE VIOLATION ALLEGEDLY OCCURRED FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, DAMAGES, OR OTHER RELIEF.
Article – Tax – General
11–206.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the sales and
use tax does not apply to a sale of food for consumption off the premises by a food vendor

SENATE BILL 889 7
who operates a substantial grocery or market business at the same location where the food
is sold.
(2) The exemption under paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) food that the vendor serves for consumption on the premises of
the buyer or of a third party; or
(ii) food for immediate consumption.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.